Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1688YC (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 598.41, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. If the court finds by clear and 3 convincing evidence that it is in the best interest of the 4 child, the court may award separate rights and responsibilities 5 of joint legal custody to each parent under paragraph 6 âaâ . If the court awards each parent separate rights and 7 responsibilities of joint custody, both parents shall retain 8 the right to legal access to information concerning the child 9 under paragraph âeâ . 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 598.41E Custody dispute resolution. 11 1. For purposes of this section, âestablished custodial 12 environment of the childâ means an environment in which a child 13 has a stable, permanent, and significant relationship with a 14 parent or a caregiver. The environment includes the physical, 15 emotional, and psychological conditions that support the 16 childâs well-being and development. 17 2. The district court shall resolve custody right disputes 18 a parent has related to the parentâs child. To initiate 19 resolution of a dispute, the parent shall file an application 20 with the court and serve process on the other parent. The 21 court shall set a hearing on the matter upon receipt of the 22 application. 23 3. The court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing to 24 determine if the resolution to the disputed custody rights 25 proposed by either parent will modify the established 26 custodial environment of the child. The court shall make the 27 determination from the childâs standpoint rather than that 28 of either parent. If the resolution proposed by a parent 29 will modify the established custodial environment of the 30 child, the parent who proposed the resolution shall have the 31 burden to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the 32 proposed resolution is in the best interest of the child. 33 If the proposed resolution will not modify the established 34 custodial environment of the child, the parent who proposed the 35 -1- LSB 1688YC (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ resolution shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence 1 that the proposed resolution is in the best interest of the 2 child. 3 4. The court shall consider all factors in section 598.41, 4 subsection 3, when resolving a dispute under this section. If 5 the court determines that a factor does not apply, the court 6 shall only be required to articulate the reasons that the 7 specific factor does not apply. 8